Oklahoma, session 2025, SB598.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 6-105, as
last amended by Section 38, Chapter 452, O.S.L. 2024 (47 O.S. Supp.
2024, Section 6-105), is amended to read as follows:
Section 6-105. A. Unless a legal custodial parent or legal
guardian has filed an objection to licensure pursuant to Section 6-
103.1 of this title, any person under eighteen (18) years of age may
be permitted to operate:
1. A Class D motor vehicle under the graduated driver license
provisions prescribed in subsections B through E of this section;
2. A motorcycle under the provisions prescribed in subsection H
of this section; or

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB598 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

3. A farm vehicle under the provisions prescribed in subsection
I of this section.
B. Any person who is at least fifteen (15) years of age may
drive during a session in which the driver is being instructed in a
driver education course, as set out in subparagraphs a, b, c, d, and
e of paragraph 1 of subsection C of this section, by a certified
driver education instructor who is seated in the right front seat of
the motor vehicle.
C. Any person:
1. Who is at least fifteen and one-half (15 1/2) years of age
and is currently receiving instruction in or has successfully
completed driver education. For purposes of this section, the term
“driver education” shall mean:
a. a prescribed secondary school driver education course,
as provided for in Sections 19-113 through 19-121 19-
124 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes,
b. a driver education course, certified by Service
Oklahoma, from a parochial, private, or other
nonpublic secondary school,
c. a commercial driver training course school, as defined
by Sections 801 through 808 of this title,
d. a parent-taught driver education course, certified by
Service Oklahoma, in conjunction with the Department
of Public Safety. Service Oklahoma shall promulgate
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB598 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

rules for any parent-taught driver education course,
or
e. a driver education course certified by a state other
than Oklahoma; or
2. Who is at least sixteen (16) years of age,
may, upon successfully passing all parts of the driver license
examination administered by Service Oklahoma, or an approved written
examination proctor, except the driving examination, be issued a
learner permit which will grant the permittee the privilege to
operate a Class D motor vehicle upon the public highways only
between the hours of 5:00 a.m. and 10:00 p.m. and while accompanied
by a licensed driver who is at least twenty-one (21) years of age
and who is actually occupying a seat beside the permittee; provided,
the written examination for a learner permit may be waived by
Service Oklahoma upon verification that the person has successfully
completed driver education.
D. 1. Any person:
a. who has applied for, been issued, and has possessed a
learner permit for a minimum of one hundred eighty
(180) days,
b. whose custodial legal parent or legal guardian
certifies to Service Oklahoma by sworn affidavit that
the person has received a minimum of fifty (50) hours
of actual behind-the-wheel training, of which at least
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB598 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

ten (10) hours of such training was at night, from a
licensed driver who was at least twenty-one (21) years
of age and who was properly licensed to operate a
Class D motor vehicle for a minimum of two (2) years,
and
c. who has completed a free course approved by the
Oklahoma Department of Transportation on teen driver
work zone and first responder safety,
may be issued an intermediate Class D license upon successfully
passing all parts of the driver license examinations administered by
Service Oklahoma; provided, the written examination, if it has not
previously been administered or waived, may be waived by Service
Oklahoma upon verification that the person has successfully
completed driver education or the driving examination may be waived
by Service Oklahoma upon successful passage of the examination
administered by a certified designated examiner, as provided for in
Section 6-110 of this title. However, notwithstanding the date of
issuance of the learner permit, if the person has been convicted of
a traffic offense which is reported on the driving record of that
person, the time period specified in subparagraph a of this
paragraph shall be recalculated to begin from the date of conviction
for the traffic offense, and must elapse before that person may be
issued an intermediate Class D license. If the person has been
convicted of more than one traffic offense which is reported on the
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB598 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

driv ing record of that person, the time period specified in
subparagraph a of this paragraph shall be recalculated to begin from
the most recent date of conviction, and must elapse before that
person may be issued an intermediate Class D license.
2. A person who has been issued an intermediate Class D license
under the provisions of this subsection:
a. shall be granted the privilege to operate a Class D
motor vehicle upon the public highways:
(1) only between the hours of 5:00 a.m. and 10:00
p.m., except for driving to and from work,
school, school activities, and church activities,
or
(2) at any time, if a licensed driver who is at least
twenty-one (21) years of age is actually
occupying a seat beside the intermediate Class D
licensee, or if the intermediate Class D licensee
is a farm or ranch resident, and is operating a
motor vehicle while engaged in farming or
ranching operations outside the limits of a
municipality, or driving to and from work,
school, school activities, or church activities,
and
b. shall not operate a motor vehicle with more than one
passenger unless:
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB598 SFLR Page 5
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

(1) all passengers live in the same household as the
custodial legal parent or legal guardian, or
(2) a licensed driver at least twenty-one (21) years
of age is actually occupying a seat beside the
intermediate Class D licensee.
E. Any person who has been issued an intermediate Class D
license for a minimum of:
1. One (1) year; or
2. One hundred eighty (180) days, if the person has completed
both the driver education and the parent-certified behind-the-wheel
training provisions of subparagraph b of paragraph 1 of subsection D
of this section,
may be issued a Class D license. However, notwithstanding the date
of issuance of the Class D license, if the person has been convicted
of a traffic offense which is reported on the driving record of that
person, the time periods specified in paragraph 1 or 2 of this
subsection, as applicable, shall be recalculated to begin from the
date of conviction for the traffic offense, and must elapse before
that person may be issued a Class D license. If the person has been
convicted of more than one traffic offense which is reported on the
driving record of that person, the time periods period specified in
paragraph 1 or 2 of this subsection, as applicable, shall be
recalculated to begin from the most recent date of conviction, and
must elapse before that person may be issued a Class D license.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB598 SFLR Page 6
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

F. Learner permits and intermediate Class D licenses shall be
issued for the same period as all other driver licenses. The
licenses may be suspended or canceled at the discretion of the
Department of Public Safety, with notice to Service Oklahoma for
violation of restrictions, for failing to give the required or
correct information on the application, for knowingly giving false
or inaccurate information on the application or any subsequent
documentation related to the granting of driving privileges, for
using a hand-held electronic device while operating a motor vehicle
for non-life-threatening emergency purposes or for violation of any
traffic laws of this state pertaining to the operation of a motor
vehicle.
G. Service Oklahoma shall promulgate rules establishing
procedures for removal of learner permit and intermediate Class D
license restrictions from the permit or license upon the permittee
or licensee qualifying for a less restricted or an unrestricted
license.
H. Any person fourteen (14) years of age or older may apply for
a restricted Class D license with a motorcycle-only restriction.
After the person has successfully passed all parts of the motorcycle
examination other than the driving examination, has successfully
completed a certified state-approved motorcycle basic rider course
approved by the Department of Public Safety, in conjunction with
Service Oklahoma, and has met all requirements provided for in the
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB598 SFLR Page 7
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

rule s of the Department and Service Oklahoma, Service Oklahoma shall
issue to the person a restricted Class D license with a motorcycle-
only restriction which shall grant to the person, while having the
license in the person’s immediate possession, the privilege to
operate a motorcycle or motor-driven cycle:
1. With a piston displacement not to exceed three hundred cubic
centimeters (300 cc) or a sixteen and eight-tenths (16.8) kilowatt
electric power source;
2. Between the hours of 4:30 a.m. to 9:00 p.m. only;
3. While wearing approved protective headgear; and
4. While accompanied by and receiving instruction from any
person who is at least twenty-one (21) years of age and who is
properly licensed pursuant to the laws of this state to operate a
motorcycle or motor-driven cycle, and who has visual contact with
the restricted licensee.
The restricted licensee may apply on or after thirty (30) days
from date of issuance of the restricted Class D license with a
motorcycle-only restriction to have the restriction of being
accompanied by a licensed driver removed by successfully completing
the driving portion of an examination.
The written examination and driving examination for a restricted
Class D license with a motorcycle-only endorsement shall be waived
by Service Oklahoma upon verification that the person has

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB598 SFLR Page 8
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

succ essfully completed a certified state-approved motorcycle basic
rider course approved by the Department and Service Oklahoma.
I. 1. Any person who is less than seventeen (17) years of age
but is at least fourteen (14) years of age and who resides upon a
farm in this state or is employed for compensation upon a farm in
this state may apply to Service Oklahoma for a farm permit
authorizing such person, while possessing the permit, to operate any
Class D motor vehicle.
2. a. A farm permit shall entitle the licensee, who is at
least fourteen (14) years of age but less than sixteen
(16) years of age, to operate the appropriate motor
vehicles at any time:
(1) while going to or from or in connection with any
farm job, employment, or other farm-related work,
(2) on days while school is in session, over the most
direct and accessible route between the
licensee’s residence and school of enrollment for
the purpose of school attendance; provided, that
the privilege shall only extend to those
licensees who reside on a farm and commute
directly from their place of residence to the
school in which they are enrolled, or
(3) when the licensee is operating a passenger car at
any time when accompanied by an adult who is the
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB598 SFLR Page 9
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

holder of a valid commercial driver license,
Class A, B, C, or D driver license and who is
actually occupying a seat beside the driver.
b. For a period of six (6) months, a farm permit shall
entitle the licensee who is at least sixteen (16)
years of age to operate the appropriate motor vehicles
at any time:
(1) from 5:00 a.m. to 9:00 p.m.,
(2) while going to or from or in connection with any
farm job, employment, or other farm-related work,
(3) while going to or from authorized school
activities,
(4) while going directly to or from any religious
worship service held by a religious organization,
or
(5) while the licensee is operating a passenger car
at any time while accompanied by an adult who is
the holder of a valid commercial driver license,
Class A, B, or C driver license, and who is
actually occupying a seat beside the driver.
After such six-month period, if the licensee has complied with the
provisions of this subsection, such farm permit shall entitle the
licensee to operate the appropriate motor vehicles at any time
without the restrictions required by this subsection.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB598 SFLR Page 10
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

3. A farm permit shall be issued only if:
a. the applicant can prove that such applicant resides or
works on a farm by submitting the signed affidavit of
either a parent or guardian stating that the applicant
lives on a farm, or
b. the applicant does not live on a farm but works on a
farm and the applicant submits the signed affidavit of
the applicant’s employer and parent or guardian
attesting to such employment, and
c. the applicant has successfully completed the
examination requirements in Section 6-110 of this
title, and
c. the applicant does not live on a farm but works on a
farm and the applicant submits the signed affidavit of
the applicant’s employer and parent or guardian
attesting to such employment.
4. Any licensee issued a farm permit under this subsection:
a. who is less than sixteen (16) years of age shall not
operate any motor vehicle with nonsibling minor
passengers,
b. who is at least sixteen (16) years of age, for a
period of six (6) months after reaching sixteen (16)
years of age, shall not operate any motor vehicle with
more than one passenger who is less than eighteen (18)
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB598 SFLR Page 11
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

years of age and who is not a member of the licensee’s
immediate family, or
c. who is at least fourteen (14) years of age, but less
than sixteen (16) years of age, shall not operate any
motor vehicle on interstate or turnpike highway
systems, nor shall a licensee operate a motor vehicle
within the limits of a city with a population in
excess of one hundred thousand (100,000) persons
according to the latest Federal Decennial Census.
Any conviction for violating this paragraph shall be construed as a
moving traffic violation. Service Oklahoma may, in its discretion,
suspend the permit of an individual for violation of this paragraph.
5. Any licensee issued a farm permit under this subsection
shall not operate a wireless communication device while driving a
motor vehicle, except that a licensee may operate a wireless
communication device while driving a motor vehicle to report illegal
activity or to summon medical or other emergency help.
6. As used in this subsection, “farm” means any parcel of land
for which the owner has an agricultural exemption permit issued by
the Oklahoma Tax Commission.
7. a. A farm permit issued under this subsection is subject
to suspension or revocation in the same manner as any
other driver license.

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB598 SFLR Page 12
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

b. A farm permit may be suspended in accordance with
Section 6-113 of this title for any violation of
restrictions under this subsection.
c. Service Oklahoma shall suspend the farm permit upon
receiving satisfactory evidence that the licensee has
been involved in two or more accidents chargeable to
the licensee and such suspended license shall not be
reinstated for one (1) year.
8. Any licensee issued a farm permit under this subsection
shall provide, prior to reaching sixteen (16) years of age, a signed
affidavit of either a parent or guardian stating that the applicant
has completed at least fifty (50) hours of adult-supervised driving
with at least ten (10) of those hours being at night. The adult-
supervised driving required by this paragraph shall be conducted by
an adult who is at least twenty-one (21) years of age and is the
holder of a valid commercial driver license, Class A, B, C, or D
driver license. Evidence of failure of any licensee who was
required to complete the fifty (50) hours of adult-supervised
driving under this subsection shall not be admissible in any action
for the purpose of determining any aspect of comparative negligence
or mitigation of damages.
9. Any licensee issued a farm permit under this subsection who:
a. is under sixteen (16) years of age and is convicted of
two or more moving traffic violations committed on
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB598 SFLR Page 13
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

separate occasions shall not be eligible to receive a
driver license which is not restricted, in accordance
with the provisions of subparagraph a of paragraph 2
of this subsection, until the person reaches seventeen
(17) years of age,.
10. Any person who is at least sixteen (16) years of age and
has been issued a farm permit for a minimum of one (1) year may
apply for and be issued a Class D license, except for any licensee
who:
b. a. is at least sixteen (16) years of age but less than
seventeen (17) years of age and is convicted of two or
more moving traffic violations committed on separate
occasions shall not be eligible to receive a driver
license which is not restricted, in accordance with
the provisions of subparagraph b of paragraph 2 of
this subsection, until the person reaches eighteen
(18) years of age, or
c. b. fails to provide the affidavit required under
paragraph 8 of this subsection shall not be eligible
to receive a driver license which is not restricted,
in accordance with the provisions of subparagraph a of
paragraph 2 of this subsection, until the person
provides such affidavit to Service Oklahoma or the

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB598 SFLR Page 14
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

person reaches seventeen (17) years of age, whichever
occurs first.
J. As used in this section:
1. “Hand-held electronic device” means a mobile telephone or
electronic device with which a user engages in a telephone call,
plays or stores media, including, but not limited to, music and
video, or sends or reads a text message while requiring the use of
at least one hand; and
2. “Using a hand-held electronic device” means engaging any
function on an electronic device.
K. All driver education courses provided for in paragraph 1 of
subsection C of this section shall include education regarding the
dangers of texting while driving and the effects of being under the
influence of alcohol or other intoxicating substance while driving.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON AERONAUTICS AND TRANSPORTATION
February 17, 2025 - DO PASS




SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB598 SFLR Page 15
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)